ispell/rootfs/usr/local/lib/english.aff
altstringchar   &Ocirc;      \xC3\x94        # ôÔ Latin letter O with circumflex
altstringchar   &otilde;     \xC3\xB5
altstringchar   &Otilde;     \xC3\x95        # õÕ Latin letter O with tilde
altstringchar   &ouml;       \xC3\xB6
altstringchar   &Ouml;       \xC3\x96        # öÖ Latin letter O with diaeresis
altstringchar   &oslash;     \xC3\xB8
altstringchar   &Oslash;     \xC3\x98        # øØ Latin letter O with stroke
altstringchar   &szlig;      \xC3\x9F        # ß Latin small letter sharp s
altstringchar   &ugrave;     \xC3\xB9
altstringchar   &Ugrave;     \xC3\x99        # ùÙ Latin letter U with grave
altstringchar   &uacute;     \xC3\xBA
altstringchar   &Uacute;     \xC3\x9A        # úÚ Latin letter U with acute
altstringchar   &ucirc;      \xC3\xBB
altstringchar   &Ucirc;      \xC3\x9B        # ûÛ Latin letter U with circumflex
altstringchar   &uuml;       \xC3\xBC
altstringchar   &Uuml;       \xC3\x9C        # üÜ Latin letter U with diaeresis
altstringchar   &yacute;     \xC3\xBD
altstringchar   &Yacute;     \xC3\x9D        # ýÝ Latin letter Y with acute
altstringchar   &yuml;       \xC3\xBF
altstringchar   &Yuml;       \xC3\xB8      # ÿŸ Latin letter Y with diaeresis
altstringchar   &thorn;      \xC3\xBE
altstringchar   &THORN;      \xC3\x9E        # þÞ Latin letter thorn

# Here's a record of flags used, in case you want to add new ones.
# Right now, we fit within the minimal MASKBITS definition.
#
#            ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ
# Used:      *  *  ****  ** * ***** ***
#            A  D  GHIJ  MN P RSTUV XYZ
# Available:  -- --    --  - -     -
#             BC EF    KL  O Q     W

# Now the prefix table.  There are only three prefixes that are truly
# frequent in English, and none of them seem to need conditional variations.
#
prefixes

flag *A:
    .		>	RE		# As in enter > reenter

flag *I:
    .		>	IN		# As in disposed > indisposed

flag *U:
    .		>	UN		# As in natural > unnatural

# Finally, the suffixes.  These are exactly the suffixes that came out
# with the original "ispell";  I haven't tried to improve them.  The only
# thing I did besides translate them was to add selected cross-product flags.
#
suffixes

flag V:
    E		>	-E,IVE		# As in create > creative
    [^E]	>	IVE		# As in prevent > preventive

flag *N:
    E		>	-E,ION		# As in create > creation
    Y		>	-Y,ICATION	# As in multiply > multiplication
    [^EY]	>	EN		# As in fall > fallen

flag *X:
    E		>	-E,IONS		# As in create > creations
    Y		>	-Y,ICATIONS	# As in multiply > multiplications
    [^EY]	>	ENS		# As in weak > weakens

flag H:
    Y		>	-Y,IETH		# As in twenty > twentieth
    [^Y]	>	TH		# As in hundred > hundredth

flag *Y:
    Y		>	-Y,ILY		# As in messy > messily
    [^Y]	>	LY		# As in quick > quickly

flag *G:
    E		>	-E,ING		# As in file > filing
    [^E]	>	ING		# As in cross > crossing

flag *J:
    E		>	-E,INGS		# As in file > filings
    [^E]	>	INGS		# As in cross > crossings

flag *D:
    E		>	D		# As in create > created
    [^AEIOU]Y	>	-Y,IED		# As in imply > implied
    [^EY]	>	ED		# As in cross > crossed
    [AEIOU]Y	>	ED		# As in convey > conveyed

flag T:
    E		>	ST		# As in late > latest
    [^AEIOU]Y	>	-Y,IEST		# As in dirty > dirtiest
    [AEIOU]Y	>	EST		# As in gray > grayest
    [^EY]	>	EST		# As in small > smallest

flag *R:
    E		>	R		# As in skate > skater
    [^AEIOU]Y	>	-Y,IER		# As in multiply > multiplier
    [AEIOU]Y	>	ER		# As in convey > conveyer
    [^EY]	>	ER		# As in build > builder

flag *Z:
    E		>	RS		# As in skate > skaters
    [^AEIOU]Y	>	-Y,IERS		# As in multiply > multipliers
    [AEIOU]Y	>	ERS		# As in convey > conveyers
    [^EY]	>	ERS		# As in build > builders

flag *S:
    [^AEIOU]Y	>	-Y,IES		# As in imply > implies
    [AEIOU]Y	>	S		# As in convey > conveys
    [CS]H	>	ES		# As in lash > lashes
    [^CS]H	>	S		# As in cough > coughs
    [SXZ]	>	ES		# As in fix > fixes
    [^SXZHY]	>	S		# As in bat > bats

flag *P:
    [^AEIOU]Y	>	-Y,INESS	# As in cloudy > cloudiness
    [AEIOU]Y	>	NESS		# As in gray > grayness
    [^Y]	>	NESS		# As in late > lateness

flag *M:
    .		>	'S		# As in dog > dog's

# $Log: english.aff,v $
# Revision 1.26  2020-12-30 22:20:19-08  geoff
# Add UTF-8 options to the default character set.
#
# Revision 1.25  2020-12-23 16:26:37-08  geoff
# Switch to UTF-8 as the default character encoding.
#
# Revision 1.24  2015-02-07 23:59:51-08  geoff
# Correct the suffix generation for words ending in TH.
#
# Revision 1.23  2005/04/21 14:06:40  geoff
# Add UTF-8 as an encoding option.
#
# Revision 1.22  2005/04/13 22:52:37  geoff
# Update the license.  Add expanded rules for LY and ES.
#
# Revision 1.21  2001/07/25 21:51:47  geoff
# *** empty log message ***
#
# Revision 1.20  2001/07/23 20:43:37  geoff
# *** empty log message ***
#
# Revision 1.19  2000/08/22 11:03:59  geoff
# Fix a typo in the previous checkin.  Provide dummy definitions for eth
# and thorn for tex/nroff, since ispell insists on having them.
#
# Revision 1.18  2000/08/22 10:52:25  geoff
# *** empty log message ***
#
# Revision 1.17  1999/01/07 01:58:15  geoff
# Update the copyright.
#
# Revision 1.16  1995/01/08  23:23:59  geoff
# Add a NeXT to the defstringtype statement so that nextispell can
# select it.
#
# Revision 1.15  1994/01/25  07:12:40  geoff
# Get rid of all old RCS log lines in preparation for the 3.1 release.
#
